lt-LT_morphology.aff
FLAG num
SFX 17208 o usiais . 1506
SFX 17208 o usiuose . 1507
SFX 17208 o usiuos . 1508
SFX 17208 o ę . 1509
SFX 17208 o usys . 1510
SFX 17208 o usi . 1511
SFX 17208 o usios . 1512
SFX 17208 o usiai . 1513
SFX 17208 o usią . 1514
SFX 17208 o usia . 1515
SFX 17208 o usioje . 1516
SFX 17208 o usioj . 1517
SFX 17208 o usi . 1518
SFX 17208 o usios . 1519
SFX 17208 o ę . 1519
SFX 17208 o usių . 1520
SFX 17208 o usioms . 1521
SFX 17208 o usiom . 1522
SFX 17208 o usias . 1523
SFX 17208 o usiomis . 1524
SFX 17208 o usiom . 1525
SFX 17208 o usiose . 1526
SFX 17208 o usios . 1527
SFX 17208 o ę . 1527
SFX 17208 o usysis . 1528
SFX 17208 o usysai . 1529
SFX 17208 o usiojo . 1530
SFX 17208 o usiajam . 1531
SFX 17208 o usįjį . 1532
SFX 17208 o usiuoju . 1533
SFX 17208 o usiajame . 1534
SFX 17208 o usiajam . 1535
SFX 17208 o usysis . 1536
SFX 17208 o usysai . 1537
SFX 17208 o usieji . 1538
SFX 17208 o usiųjų . 1539
SFX 17208 o usiesiems . 1540
SFX 17208 o usiesiem . 1541
SFX 17208 o usiuosius . 1542
SFX 17208 o usiaisiais . 1543
SFX 17208 o usiuosiuose . 1544
SFX 17208 o usiuosiuos . 1545
SFX 17208 o usieji . 1546
SFX 17208 o usioji . 1547
SFX 17208 o usiosios . 1548
SFX 17208 o usiajai . 1549
SFX 17208 o usiąją . 1550
SFX 17208 o usiąja . 1551
SFX 17208 o usiojoje . 1552
SFX 17208 o usiojoj . 1553
SFX 17208 o usioji . 1554
SFX 17208 o usiosios . 1555
SFX 17208 o usiųjų . 1556
SFX 17208 o usiosioms . 1557
SFX 17208 o usiosiom . 1558
SFX 17208 o usiąsias . 1559
SFX 17208 o usiosiomis . 1560
SFX 17208 o usiosiom . 1561
SFX 17208 o usiosiose . 1562
SFX 17208 o usiosios . 1563
SFX 17208 ėsi ęsis . 1489
SFX 17208 osi ęsis . 1489
SFX 17208 ėsi ęsi . 1499
SFX 17208 osi ęsi . 1499
SFX 17208 ėsi iusis [^dt]ėsi 1511
SFX 17208 dėsi džiusis . 1511
SFX 17208 tėsi čiusis . 1511
SFX 17208 osi usis . 1511
SFX 17208 ėsi iusiosi [^dt]ėsi 1519
SFX 17208 dėsi džiusiosi . 1519
SFX 17208 tėsi čiusiosi . 1519
SFX 17208 osi usiosi . 1519
SFX 17208 ė ius [^dt]ė 1564
SFX 17208 dė džius . 1564
SFX 17208 tė čius . 1564
SFX 17208 o us . 1564
SFX 17208 ėsi iusis [^dt]ėsi 1564
SFX 17208 dėsi džiusis . 1564
SFX 17208 tėsi čiusis . 1564
SFX 17208 osi usis . 1564

SFX 17246 Y 32
SFX 17246 ė iusian [^dt]ė 1565
SFX 17246 ė iusiuosna [^dt]ė 1566
SFX 17246 ė iusion [^dt]ė 1567
SFX 17246 ė iusiosna [^dt]ė 1568
SFX 17246 ė iusiajan [^dt]ė 1569
SFX 17246 ė iusiuosiuosna [^dt]ė 1570
SFX 17246 ė iusiojon [^dt]ė 1571
SFX 17246 ė iusiosiosna [^dt]ė 1572
SFX 17246 dė džiusian . 1565
SFX 17246 dė džiusiuosna . 1566
SFX 17246 dė džiusion . 1567
SFX 17246 dė džiusiosna . 1568
SFX 17246 dė džiusiajan . 1569
SFX 17246 dė džiusiuosiuosna . 1570
SFX 17246 dė džiusiojon . 1571
SFX 17246 dė džiusiosiosna . 1572
SFX 17246 tė čiusian . 1565
SFX 17246 tė čiusiuosna . 1566
SFX 17246 tė čiusion . 1567
SFX 17246 tė čiusiosna . 1568
SFX 17246 tė čiusiajan . 1569
SFX 17246 tė čiusiuosiuosna . 1570
SFX 17246 tė čiusiojon . 1571
SFX 17246 tė čiusiosiosna . 1572
SFX 17246 o usian . 1565
SFX 17246 o usiuosna . 1566
SFX 17246 o usion . 1567
SFX 17246 o usiosna . 1568
SFX 17246 o usiajan . 1569
SFX 17246 o usiuosiuosna . 1570
SFX 17246 o usiojon . 1571
SFX 17246 o usiosiosna . 1572

SFX 17247 Y 16
SFX 17247 ė iusiu [^dt]ė 1573
SFX 17247 ė iusi [^dt]ė 1574
SFX 17247 ė iusiuoju [^dt]ė 1575
SFX 17247 ė iusioji [^dt]ė 1576
SFX 17247 dė džiusiu . 1573
SFX 17247 dė džiusi . 1574
SFX 17247 dė džiusiuoju . 1575
SFX 17247 dė džiusioji . 1576
SFX 17247 tė čiusiu . 1573
SFX 17247 tė čiusi . 1574
SFX 17247 tė čiusiuoju . 1575
SFX 17247 tė čiusioji . 1576
SFX 17247 o usiu . 1573
SFX 17247 o usi . 1574
SFX 17247 o usiuoju . 1575
SFX 17247 o usioji . 1576

SFX 17610 Y 6
SFX 17610 o o . 1485
SFX 17610 ė ė . 1485
SFX 17610 o ę . 1500
SFX 17610 ė ę . 1500
SFX 17610 o us . 1564
SFX 17610 ė us . 1564

SFX 17616 Y 21
SFX 17616 ai ai . 1577
SFX 17616 ai iau [^dijt]ai 156
SFX 17616 dai džiau . 156
SFX 17616 iai iau . 156
SFX 17616 jai jau . 156
SFX 17616 tai čiau . 156
SFX 17616 ai iausiai [^dijt]ai 161
SFX 17616 dai džiausiai . 161
SFX 17616 iai iausiai . 161
SFX 17616 jai jausiai . 161
SFX 17616 tai čiausiai . 161
SFX 17616 ai iausia [^dijt]ai 1578
SFX 17616 dai džiausia . 1578
SFX 17616 iai iausia . 1578
SFX 17616 jai jausia . 1578
SFX 17616 tai čiausia . 1578
SFX 17616 ai yn [^i]ai 238
SFX 17616 iai yn [^čž]iai 238
SFX 17616 čiai tyn . 238
SFX 17616 žiai žyn [^d]žiai 238
SFX 17616 džiai dyn . 238

SFX 17622 Y 5
SFX 17622 ai ėliau [^i]ai 159
SFX 17622 čiai tėliau . 159
SFX 17622 džiai dėliau . 159
SFX 17622 iai ėliau [^žč]iai 159
SFX 17622 žiai žėliau [^d]žiai 159

SFX 17642 Y 8
SFX 17642 i i . 1577
SFX 17642 i iau [^t]i 156
SFX 17642 ti čiau . 156
SFX 17642 i iausiai [^t]i 161
SFX 17642 ti čiausiai . 161
SFX 17642 i iausia [^t]i 1578
SFX 17642 ti čiausia . 1578
SFX 17642 i yn . 238

SFX 17645 Y 1
SFX 17645 i ėliau . 159

SFX 17651 Y 6
SFX 17651 g g . 1577
SFX 17651 0 el . 1579
SFX 17651 0 iau . 156
SFX 17651 0 iausiai . 161
SFX 17651 0 iausia . 1580
SFX 17651 0 yn . 238

SFX 17654 Y 1
SFX 17654 0 ėliau . 159

SFX 17658 Y 5
SFX 17658 a a [^it]a 1577
SFX 17658 a iau [^it]a 156
SFX 17658 a iausiai [^it]a 161
SFX 17658 a iausia [^it]a 1580
SFX 17658 a yn [^it]a 238

SFX 17660 Y 1
SFX 17660 a ėliau [^it]a 159

SFX 17664 Y 28
SFX 17664 ui ui [^dij]ui 1577
SFX 17664 ui iau [^dij]ui 156
SFX 17664 ui iausiai [^dij]ui 161
SFX 17664 ui iausia [^dij]ui 1578
SFX 17664 iui iui [^čž]iui 1577
SFX 17664 iui iau [^čž]iui 156
SFX 17664 iui iausiai [^čž]iui 161
SFX 17664 iui iausia [^čž]iui 1578
SFX 17664 čiui čiui . 1577
SFX 17664 čiui čiau . 156
SFX 17664 čiui čiausiai . 161
SFX 17664 čiui čiausia . 1578
SFX 17664 žiui žiui [^d]žiui 1577
SFX 17664 žiui žiau [^d]žiui 156
SFX 17664 žiui žiausiai [^d]žiui 161
SFX 17664 žiui žiausia [^d]žiui 1578
SFX 17664 džiui džiui . 1577
SFX 17664 džiui džiau . 156
SFX 17664 džiui džiausiai . 161
SFX 17664 džiui džiausia . 1578
SFX 17664 dui dui . 1577
SFX 17664 dui džiau . 156
SFX 17664 dui džiausiai . 161
SFX 17664 dui džiausia . 1578
SFX 17664 jui jui . 1577
SFX 17664 jui jau . 156
SFX 17664 jui jausiai . 161
SFX 17664 jui jausia . 1578

SFX 17666 Y 7
SFX 17666 ui ėliau [^dij]ui 159
SFX 17666 iui ėliau [^čž]iui 159
SFX 17666 čiui tėliau . 159
SFX 17666 žiui žėliau [^d]žiui 159
SFX 17666 džiui dėliau . 159
SFX 17666 dui dėliau . 159
SFX 17666 jui jėliau . 159

SFX 17699 Y 8
SFX 17699 iau iau [^č]iau 156
SFX 17699 iau iausiai [^č]iau 161
SFX 17699 iau iausia [^č]iau 1578
SFX 17699 iau yn [^č]iau 238
SFX 17699 čiau čiau . 156
SFX 17699 čiau čiausiai . 161
SFX 17699 čiau čiausia . 1578
SFX 17699 čiau tyn . 238

SFX 17700 Y 2
SFX 17700 iau ėliau [^č]iau 159
SFX 17700 čiau tėliau . 159

SFX 17709 Y 5
SFX 17709 a a . 1577
SFX 17709 a omis . 1577
SFX 17709 a om . 228
SFX 17709 omis omis . 1577
SFX 17709 omis om . 228

SFX 17714 Y 2
SFX 17714 iausiai iausiai . 161
SFX 17714 iausiai iausia . 1578

AF 17616,65521 # 23
AF 17616,17622,65521 # 72
AF 17709,65521 # 84
AF 17642,17645,65521 # 107
AF 17699,65521 # 114
AF 17651,17654,65521 # 277
AF 17699,17700,65521 # 280
AF 17714,65521 # 301
AF 17664,65521 # 316
AF 17642,65521 # 367
AF 17651,65521 # 374
AF 17664,17666,65521 # 405
AF 17658,17660,65521 # 413
