lt-LT_morphology.dic
anksti/107	10
ankštai/23	10
apačiau/114	10
apgraibomis/84	10
apsukomis/84	10
armėniškai/23	10
arti/107	10
artimai/72	10
atatupstomis/84	10
atidžiai/72	10
atsargiai/72	10
atžagariomis/84	10
audringai/23	10
aukštai/72	10
basomis/84	10
bėgomis/84	10
bergždžiai/23	10
brangiai/72	10
chroniškai/23	10
daug/277	10
desperatiškai/23	10
dešiniau/280	10
didžiai/72	10
draugiškai/72	10
drausmingai/23	10
emocionaliai/23	10
galiausiai/301	10
gausiai/72	10
geltonai/23	10
giliai/72	10
greitai/72	10
greitosiomis/84	10
gudriai/72	10
įdomiai/72	10
įkalniui/316	10
ilgai/72	10
imčiomis/84	10
įpiečiau/114	10
įryčiau/114	10
įsauliui/316	10
įšiauriau/114	10
išsamiai/72	10
ištvermingai/23	10
įvakariau/114	10
įžiemiau/114	10
juokingai/72	10
kairiau/280	10
kaktomuša/84	10
keliaklupstomis/84	10
kibiai/23	10
kietai/72	10
klūpomis/84	10
klupstomis/84	10
kniūpsčia/84	10
kūliavirsčia/84	10
kurčiai/23	10
kuždomis/84	10
labai/72	10
lengvai/72	10
lietuviškai/72	10
linksmai/72	10
materialistiškai/23	10
mažai/72	10
naujai/72	10
neanksti/367	10
nearti/367	10
neatlaidžiai/23	10
nedaug/374	10
nedažnai/23	10
neemociškai/23	10
negirdomis/84	10
negracingai/23	10
neįstabiai/23	10
nejuokomis/84	10
nekapitališkai/23	10
nekruopščiai/23	10
nematomis/84	10
nemėgėjiškai/23	10
nenuodugniai/23	10
nepakniopstomis/84	10
nepasyviai/23	10
nepirmiausiai/301	10
neprakilniai/23	10
nereligiškai/23	10
nesilpnai/23	10
neslapta/84	10
nestebuklingai/23	10
netaikiai/23	10
netyčia/84	10
netoli/367	10
netuščiomis/84	10
neūkiškai/23	10
nežaibiškai/23	10
nežiūromis/84	10
noriai/72	10
noromis/84	10
pabrėžtinai/23	10
padilbomis/84	10
pagraibomis/84	10
pakalniui/316	10
pakankamai/72	10
pakniopstomis/84	10
pakuždomis/84	10
paniūromis/84	10
paprastai/72	10
pasiučiau/114	10
paskiau/280	10
paskiausiai/301	10
paskubomis/84	10
paskui/405	10
pasriūbomis/84	10
pasverdomis/84	10
pašnibždomis/84	10
patylomis/84	10
patogiai/72	10
pavėjui/316	10
pavieniui/316	10
piečiau/114	10
pigiai/72	10
pirma/413	10
pirmiau/280	10
pirmiausiai/301	10
pirmučiausiai/301	10
plačiai/72	10
pragmatiškai/23	10
priešokomis/84	10
ramiai/72	10
refleksiškai/23	10
repečkomis/84	10
ryčiau/114	10
rimtai/72	10
ropomis/84	10
saugiai/72	10
savitai/23	10
seniai/72	10
skaudžiai/72	10
skubomis/84	10
smagiai/72	10
smulkiai/72	10
socialiai/23	10
staigiai/72	10
sunkiai/72	10
sutartinai/23	10
šaltai/72	10
šiauriau/280	10
šnabždomis/84	10
švariai/72	10
šviesiai/72	10
tankiai/72	10
tautiškai/23	10
teisingai/72	10
tyčia/84	10
tiksliai/72	10
tinkamai/72	10
toli/107	10
tvirtai/72	10
ūmai/23	10
užkuriomis/84	10
vakariau/114	10
vikriai/23	10
vogčia/84	10
žiemiau/114	10
